Nevada, session 83, SB55.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 231 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. The Commission on Tourism shall, subject to the
availability of funds appropriated for such purpose, develop and
administer a grant program to award grants to businesses engaged
in or that wish to engage in agritourism in this State.
2. The Commission shall adopt regulations to carry out the
provisions of this section. The regulations must prescribe, without
limitation:
(a) The criteria for eligibility to receive a grant from the grant
program; and
(b) Procedures for the submission and review of applications
to receive money from the grant program.
3. In adopting the regulations required pursuant to
subsection 2, the Commission shall consult with the Department of
Agriculture to establish the types of businesses which qualify as
agritourism.
4. As used in this section:
(a) “Agritourism” means the combination of agriculture,
horticulture or viticulture with tourism by a business, such as a
farm or ranch, to attract members of the general public to visit the
business for enjoyment, education, recreation or participation in
agritourism activities. The term does not include any business
which grows, farms, acquires, cultivates, processes, produces,
delivers, transports, supplies or sells cannabis, cannabis products,
hemp or a commodity or product made using hemp.
(b) “Agritourism activity” means any activity offered by a
business engaged in agritourism, regardless of whether there is a
charge for the activity, that invites members of the general public
to view or participate in activities relating to agriculture,
horticulture or viticulture, including, without limitation, farming,
ranching, harvest-your-own operations, activities relating to
natural resources, camping, brewing, wine-making, distilling and
preparing food items.
(c) “Cannabis” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 678A.085.
(d) “Cannabis product” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 678A.120.
(e) “Hemp” has the meaning ascribed to it in NRS 557.160.
Sec. 2. NRS 231.8111 is hereby amended to read as follows:
231.8111 As used in NRS 231.8111 to 231.8179, inclusive,
and section 1 of this act, unless the context otherwise requires, the
-
*SB55*

– 4 –
words and terms defined in NRS 231.8113 and 231.8115 have the
meanings ascribed to them in those sections.
Sec. 3. NRS 231.8141 is hereby amended to read as follows:
231.8141 1. The Fund for Tourism and Cultural Affairs is
hereby created in the State Treasury, to be administered by the
Director.
2. Money in the Fund must be used to support the operations of
the Department in administering the provisions of NRS 231.8111 to
231.8179, inclusive [.] , and section 1 of this act. The money in the
Fund must remain in the Fund and does not revert to the State
General Fund at the end of any fiscal year.
3. Claims against the Fund must be paid as other claims against
the State are paid.
4. Interest and income earned on money in the Fund must be
credited to the Fund.
Sec. 4. Title 49 of NRS is hereby amended by adding thereto a
new chapter to consist of the provisions set forth as sections 5 to 18,
inclusive, of this act.
Sec. 5. As used in sections 5 to 18, inclusive, of this act,
unless the context otherwise requires, the words and terms defined
in sections 6 to 12, inclusive, of this act, have the meanings
ascribed to them in those sections.
Sec. 6. “Agritourism” means the combination of agriculture,
horticulture or viticulture with tourism by a business, such as a
farm or ranch, to attract members of the general public to visit the
business for enjoyment, education, recreation or participation in
agritourism activities. The term does not include any business
which grows, farms, acquires, cultivates, processes, produces,
delivers, transports, supplies or sells cannabis, cannabis products,
hemp or a commodity or product made using hemp.
Sec. 7. “Agritourism activity” means any activity offered by a
business engaged in agritourism, regardless of whether there is a
charge for the activity, that invites members of the general public
to view or participate in activities relating to agriculture,
horticulture or viticulture, including, without limitation, farming,
ranching, harvest-your-own operations, activities relating to
natural resources, camping, brewing, wine-making, distilling and
preparing food items.
Sec. 8. “Cannabis” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 678A.085.
Sec. 9. “Cannabis product” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 678A.120.
Sec. 10. “Department” means the State Department of
Agriculture.
Sec. 11. “Director” means the Director of the Department.
-
*SB55*

– 5 –
Sec. 12. “Hemp” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 557.160.
Sec. 13. 1. The Director shall adopt regulations
establishing the types of businesses that qualify as agritourism for
the purposes of sections 5 to 18, inclusive, of this act which must
include, without limitation, farms, ranches and other outdoor
businesses that offer agritourism activities, such as wineries,
breweries, event venues, cottage food operations and businesses
that offer overnight camping on the premises.
2. As used in this section, “cottage food operation” has the
meaning ascribed to it in NRS 446.866.
Sec. 14. 1. The Department shall:
(a) Develop opportunities for businesses engaged in or that
wish to engage in agritourism in this State;
(b) Develop marketing campaigns to promote agritourism and
agritourism activities in this State;
(c) Provide outreach and support to businesses engaged in or
that wish to engage in agritourism in this State; and
(d) Coordinate with the Department of Tourism and Cultural
Affairs in carrying out the duties set forth in this subsection.
2. To assist in carrying out the duties set forth in subsection
1, the Director shall employ a full-time qualified professional and
determine the qualifications, duties and compensation of the
professional. Such employee is in the classified service of the
State.
Sec. 15. 1. If an operator of a business engaged in or that
wishes to engage in agritourism is denied a permit which is
required by an ordinance, resolution or regulation of a local
governing body to operate or offer agritourism activities, the
operator may appeal that decision to the Director. The Director
may issue a special use permit to the operator which supersedes
the ordinance, resolution or regulation of the local governing body
and enables the operator to engage in agritourism or offer an
agritourism activity.
2. All money collected from any fee charged for a special use
permit issued pursuant to this section must be accounted for
separately and paid on an annual basis to the county in which the
special use permit is issued.
3. The Director shall adopt regulations to carry out the
provisions of this section. Such regulations must include, without
limitation, a process whereby a governing body of a county may
review the special use permit and approve or deny the issuance of
the special use permit.
4. As used in this section, “local governing body” means:
(a) The governing body of a county, city or town; and
-
*SB55*

– 6 –
(b) Any district, board, council or commission that is charged
with the execution of limited functions or duties within a county,
including, without limitation, any district, board, council or
commission organized pursuant to chapters 244, 318, 474 and 539
of NRS, NRS 269.024 to 269.0248, inclusive, and 450.550 to
450.750, inclusive.
Sec. 16. For the purposes of sections 17 and 18 of this act,
the inherent risks of an agritourism activity include, without
limitation:
1. Any dangers or conditions that are an integral part of the
agritourism activity, including, without limitation, surface and
subsurface conditions, the natural condition of the land,
vegetation or water, the behavior of wild or domestic animals and
the ordinary dangers of structures or equipment used in farming
and ranching operations; and
2. The potential for a participant to act in a negligent manner
that may contribute to injury, loss, damage or death to a
participant or the personal property of the participant or other
participants, including, without limitation, failing to follow
instructions given by an operator of a business engaged in
agritourism or failing to exercise reasonable caution while
participating in an agritourism activity.
Sec. 17. 1. An operator of a business engaged in
agritourism shall prominently post and maintain warning signs in
a clearly visible location at the entrance of the business and at the
site of any agritourism activity offered by the business to members
of the general public. The warning signs must, without limitation:
(a) Be written in black letters, with each letter not less than 1
inch in height; and
(b) Include the language set forth in subsection 3.
2. Every contract entered into by an operator of a business
engaged in agritourism on or off the site and every contract
offered by an operator at the location of any agritourism activity
must contain in clearly readable print the language set forth
subsection 3.
3. Every warning sign posted pursuant to subsection 1 and
contract subject to the provisions of subsection 2 must include the
following language:

WARNING
Under Nevada law, an operator of a business engaged in
agritourism is not liable for an injury, loss, damage or death
to a participant or the personal property of a participant of
an agritourism activity at this location if the injury or death
results from an inherent risk of the agritourism activity.
-
*SB55*

– 7 –
Inherent risks of agritourism activities include, without
limitation, risks of injury inherent to land, equipment and
animals, as well as the potential for you or another
participant to act in a negligent manner that may contribute
to your injury or death. You are assuming the risk of
participating in this agritourism activity.
Sec. 18. 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3, an
operator of a business engaged in agritourism is not liable for an
injury, loss, damage or death to a participant or the personal
property of a participant resulting from any inherent risk of an
activity offered by the business if the warnings required pursuant
to section 17 of this act are posted and included in any contracts in
accordance with the requirements of that section.
2. An operator of a business engaged in agritourism may
claim as an affirmative defense that an injury, loss, damage or
death to a participant or the personal property of a participant
resulted exclusively from an inherent risk of an agritourism
activity offered by the business and the warning was posted in
accordance with the requirements of section 17 of this act.
3. Nothing in this section shall be construed:
(a) To prevent or limit the liability of an operator of a business
engaged in agritourism:
(1) If the operator:
(I) Commits or omits an act if the act or omission
constitutes willful or wanton disregard for the safety of the
participant and that act or omission proximately causes an injury,
loss, damage or death to a participant or the personal property of a
participant; or
(II) Has actual knowledge or reasonably should have
known of a dangerous condition on the land, facilities or
equipment used in the agritourism activity or the dangerous
propensity of a particular animal used in such agritourism activity
and does not make the danger known to the participant, and the
danger proximately causes an injury, loss, damage or death to a
participant or the personal property of a participant.
(2) In an action for product liability; or
(b) To prohibit an operator of a business engaged in
agritourism from asserting the assumption of risk as an
affirmative defense.
Sec. 19. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to the Commission on Tourism the sum of $50,000
for the grant program created pursuant to section 1 of this act to
award grants to businesses engaged in or that wish to engage in
agritourism.
-
*SB55*

– 8 –
2. Any remaining balance of the appropriation made by
subsection 1 must not be committed for expenditure after June 30,
2027, by the entity to which the appropriation is made or any entity
to which money from the appropriation is granted or otherwise
transferred in any manner, and any portion of the appropriated
money remaining must not be spent for any purpose after
September 17, 2027, by either the entity to which the money was
appropriated or the entity to which the money was subsequently
granted or transferred, and must be reverted to the State General
Fund on or before September 17, 2027.
Sec. 20. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to the State Department of Agriculture:
(a) The sum of $47,500 for:
(1) Developing opportunities, marketing campaigns and
providing outreach and support relating to agritourism pursuant to
section 14 of this act; and
(2) Membership in NAFDMA International Agritourism
Association and to attend the convention held by NAFDMA
International Agritourism Association.
(b) The sum of $173,760 for the salary and costs related to
employment of the qualified professional employed by the Director
of the Department pursuant to section 14 of this act.
2. Any remaining balance of the appropriations made by
subsection 1 must not be committed for expenditure after June 30,
2027, by the entity to which the appropriations are made or any
entity to which money from the appropriations are granted or
otherwise transferred in any manner, and any portion of the
appropriated money remaining must not be spent for any purpose
after September 17, 2027, by either the entity to which the money
was appropriated or the entity to which the money was subsequently
granted or transferred, and must be reverted to the State General
Fund on or before September 17, 2027.
Sec. 21. 1. This section becomes effective upon passage and
approval.
2. Sections 1 to 14, inclusive, 19 and 20 of this act become
effective on July 1, 2025.
3. Sections 15 to 18, inclusive, of this act become effective:
(a) Upon passage and approval for the purpose of adopting any
regulations and performing any other preparatory administrative
tasks that are necessary to carry out the provisions of this act; and
(b) On July 1, 2026, for all other purposes.
H
-
*SB55*